Washington statutes.
RCW 35.99.020

Permits for use of right-of-way.

A city or town may grant, issue, or deny permits for the use of the right-of-way by a service provider for installing, maintaining, repairing, or removing facilities for telecommunications services or cable television services pursuant to ordinances, consistent with chapter 83, Laws of 2000.

[ 2000 c 83 s 2.]